Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 3 Aid to the Blind

Cross references.

Georgia Industries for the Blind, T. 30, C. 2.

Blindness education, screening, and treatment program, § 31-1-23.

49-4-50.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Aid to the Blind Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 23.

49-4-51.
Definitions; when person considered blind.

As used in this article, the term:

“Applicant” means a person who has applied for assistance under this article.

“Assistance” means money payments to or hospital care in behalf of needy blind individuals but shall not include any such payments to or care in behalf of any such individual who:

Is a patient in an institution for tuberculosis or mental illness or developmental disability; or

Has been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or being mentally ill or developmentally disabled and is a patient in a medical institution as a result thereof.

“Medical institution” means an institution that is organized to provide medical, nursing, or convalescent care.

“Ophthalmologist” means a physician who is licensed to practice medicine in this state and who is actively engaged in the treatment of diseases of the human eye.

“Optometrist” means an individual who is licensed and registered to practice optometry in this state and who is actively engaged in the measurement of the powers of vision of the human eye.

“Public institution” means an institution that is the responsibility of a governmental unit or over which a governmental unit exercises administrative control.

“Recipient” means a person who has received assistance under this article.

“Supplementary services” means services other than money payments to blind persons in need.

A person shall be considered blind for the purposes of this article if his vision, with correcting glasses, is so defective as to prevent the performance of activities for which eyesight is essential. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations stating, in terms of ophthalmic measurements, the amount of visual acuity which an applicant may have and still be eligible for assistance under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1952, p. 233, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 368, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-5, 3-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 3-5/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (a)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “ ‘Assistance’ means money payments to or hospital care in behalf of needy blind individuals but does not include any such payments to or care in behalf of any such individual who is an inmate of a public institution (except as a patient in a medical institution) nor any individual who:”; added paragraph (a)(3); redesignated former paragraphs (a)(3) and (a)(4) as present paragraphs (a)(4) and (a)(5), respectively; added paragraph (a)(6); and redesignated former paragraphs (a)(5) and (a)(6) as present paragraphs (a)(7) and (a)(8), respectively.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

49-4-52.
Eligibility for assistance under this article.

Assistance shall be granted under this article to any blind person who:

Does not have sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health, except that, after March 1, 1961, in making such determination, the first $85.00 per month of earned income plus one-half of earned income in excess of $85.00 per month shall be disregarded;

Has been a bona fide resident of the state for not less than one year;

Is not receiving old-age assistance; and

Is not publicly soliciting alms in any part of this state by the wearing, carrying, or exhibiting of signs denoting blindness, by the carrying of receptacles for the reception of alms, by the doing of such acts by proxy, or by begging from house to house.

Inmates of any public institution meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section may be granted assistance, provided such public institution has entered into an agreement with the Department of Community Health to determine an inmate’s eligibility for assistance and services. Such agreement shall require the public institution or medical institution providing services to such inmate to provide the Department of Community Health with the required monetary payment to match the federal matching funds as set forth in federal law for the services received.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 3; Ga. L. 1952, p. 233, §§ 4, 6; Ga. L. 1961, p. 415, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 385, § 19; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 3-6/SB 407.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “All assistance under this article shall be suspended in the event of and during the period of confinement in any public penal institution after final conviction of a crime against the laws of this state or any political subdivision thereof.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

49-4-53.
Duties of department under this article.

The department shall:

Supervise the administration of assistance under this article by the county departments;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out this article;

Establish the procedure to be followed in securing a competent medical examination for the purpose of determining blindness in the individual applicant for assistance;

Prescribe the form of and print and supply to the county departments such forms as it may deem necessary and advisable;

Publish in print or electronically an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary;

Designate a suitable number of ophthalmologists and optometrists to examine applicants and recipients of assistance to the blind;

Fix the fees to be paid to ophthalmologists and optometrists for examinations of applicants, such fees to be paid out of funds allocated to the department or to the county departments; and

Initiate or cooperate with other agencies in developing measures for the prevention of blindness; the restoration of eyesight; the vocational adjustment of blind persons, including employment in regular industries, independent business, sheltered workshops, or home industry; and the instruction of the adult blind in their homes.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 5; Ga. L. 1952, p. 233, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

49-4-54.
Duties of county departments under this article.

The county departments shall:

Administer this article in their respective counties, subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the Board of Human Services pursuant to this article;

Report to the Department of Human Services at such times and in such manner and form as the department may from time to time direct; and

Submit to the county commissioner or board of commissioners or the legally constituted fiscal or financial agent of the county, after approval by the department, a budget containing an estimate and supporting data setting forth the amount of money needed to carry out this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-3/HB 228.

49-4-55.
Examination of applicant by ophthalmologist or optometrist.

No application for assistance under this article shall be approved until the applicant has been examined by an ophthalmologist or optometrist designated or approved by the department to make such examinations. The examining ophthalmologist or optometrist shall certify the findings of the examination in writing upon forms provided by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 9; Ga. L. 1952, p. 233, § 3.

Cross references.

Licensing of optometrists generally, T. 43, C. 30.

49-4-56.
Reexamination of recipient’s eyesight; furnishing information.

A recipient shall submit to a reexamination as to his eyesight when required to do so by the county department or the Department of Human Services. He shall also furnish any information required by the county department or the Department of Human Services.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 15; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-4-57.
Providing supplementary treatment services.

Supplementary services may be provided by a county department to any applicant or recipient who is in need of treatment either to prevent blindness or to restore his eyesight, whether or not he is blind as defined in subsection (b) of Code Section 49-4-51, if he is otherwise qualified for assistance under this article. The supplementary services may include necessary traveling and other expenses to receive treatment from a hospital or clinic designated by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 16.

49-4-58.
Assistance is neither assignable nor subject to legal process; payment of assistance check after death of recipient.

Assistance granted under this article shall not be transferable or assignable at law or in equity; and none of the money paid or payable under this article shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

Where a recipient dies after authorization of his assistance grant but before negotiation of his assistance check for the month in which his death occurs, endorsement of such check without recourse by the department to the spouse or nearest living relative of the recipient shall be sufficient authorization to the drawee bank to pay such check.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 12; Ga. L. 1950, p. 287, § 1.

49-4-59.
Recovery of assistance payments from recipient’s estate; federal share of amounts recovered.

The total amount of assistance paid under this article shall be allowed as a claim against the estate of a deceased recipient after funeral expenses, not to exceed $75.00, and the expense of administering the estate have been paid; provided, however, that no claim shall be enforced against any real estate of a recipient while it is occupied by his or her surviving spouse or dependent.

The federal government shall be entitled to a share of any amounts collected under subsection (a) of this Code section from recipients or from their estates, if required as a condition to federal financial participation in assistance under this article, equal to not more than one-half of the amount collected; and this amount shall be specified by the department. The amount due the United States shall be paid promptly to it by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 18.

49-4-60.
Payment of assistance after recipient moves to another county.

Any recipient who moves to another county in this state shall be entitled, with the approval of the Department of Human Services, to receive assistance in the county to which he has moved; and the county department of the county from which he has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the recipient to the county department of the county to which he has moved. The county from which the recipient has moved shall pay the assistance for a period of two months, after which time the county to which he has moved shall pay the assistance, if he remains otherwise eligible.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 19; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-4-61.
Claims to assistance subject to amendments or repeals.

All assistance granted under this article shall be deemed to be granted and to be held subject to any amending or repealing Act that may hereafter be passed; and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of his assistance being affected in any way by any amending or repealing Act.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 568, § 22.